Missouri, session 2026, HB3436.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 386, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 386.381 and 386.620, to read as follows:
386.381. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all
ratemaking determinations by the commission shall be just and reasonable and shall
also be based upon a finding that any change in a utility rate will not be unduly
burdensome to the current affordability of utility services to customers. For purposes of
this section, "just and reasonable", as it relates to a utility rate or charge, shall mean
that the rate or charge shall result in the lowest possible ratepayer impact that is
necessary for the utility to provide safe and adequate service.
386.620. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service commission;
(2) "Public utility", the same as defined in section 386.020.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, any public
hearing by the commission held for the receipt of evidentiary testimony from members
of the public for purposes of a general rate proceeding shall be subject to the following
requirements:
(1) At least one local public hearing shall be reasonably close to the residence of
each utility customer located within the geographical area served by the public utility
proposing a rate increase in the general rate proceeding;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3436 2
(2) Notice of the local public hearing shall be mailed to the physical address of
every utility customer under subdivision (1) of this subsection by first class mail and
shall be mailed at least fourteen days prior to the hearing;
(3) Any affected ratepayer from the proposed rate increase in the general rate
proceeding may testify at the public hearing and may file statements regarding the
subject matter of the hearing with the person or persons conducting the hearing;
(4) Any testimony or filed statements shall become part of the commission's
evidentiary record during the general rate proceeding under this section;
(5) The commission shall give each member of the public a reasonable amount of
time to testify before the commission during the public hearing; and
(6) In the general rate proceeding, the final order of the commission shall include
findings that describe how the commission's decision was impacted by the testimony and
comments received from members of the public during the public hearing.
✔